New York, session 2025-2026, A5694.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 164 of the executive law, as amended by chapter 833 2 of the laws of 1965, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 164. Reports by and to the department. Each department, other than 4 the executive department, shall make an annual report to the governor 5 and legislature on or before the fifteenth day of May, for the preceding 6 calendar year. It shall contain such information concerning the depart- 7 ment and its several divisions, bureaus, offices, agencies and insti- 8 tutions, and their activities and affairs, and such recommendations, as 9 the head of the department shall deem necessary or proper, and any 10 matters required by express provision of law to be included in such 11 report. A department also shall make such other and special reports as 12 the governor or either house of the legislature may require. From time 13 to time, the head of a department may require from any board, commission 14 or other body in the department or from any subordinate officer or 15 employee, division or bureau of the department, or from any institution 16 subject to the supervision of the department, or from any agency of the 17 department, such reports or information as such head may deem necessary. 18 Unless expressly authorized by the head of the department, there shall 19 be hereafter no separate report, annual or otherwise, directly to the 20 legislature or governor by any such board, commission, body, officer, 21 division, bureau, institution or agency notwithstanding any existing 22 provision of law authorizing or requiring such report. Each department, 23 to the extent practicable, shall make such annual report available to 24 members of the legislature in electronic format. Such reports shall be 25 forwarded to members of the legislature in printed form only upon 26 specific request of a member of the legislature for such printed report. 27 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03912-01-5